Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.420

Undergraduate internship program—Executive fellows program.

The state internship program shall consist of two individual internship programs as follows:

(1) An undergraduate internship program consisting of three-month to six-month positions for students working toward an undergraduate degree. In addition, a public sector employee, whether working toward a degree or not, shall be eligible to participate in the program upon the written recommendation of the head of the employee's agency.

(2) An executive fellows program consisting of one-year to two-year placements for students who have successfully completed at least one year of graduate level work and have demonstrated a substantial interest in public sector management. Positions in this program shall be as assistants or analysts at the midmanagement level or higher. In addition, a public sector employee, whether working toward an advanced degree or not, or who has not successfully completed one year of graduate-level work as required by this subsection, shall be eligible to participate in the program upon the written recommendation of the head of the employee's agency. Participants in the executive fellows program who were not public employees prior to accepting a position in the program shall receive insurance and retirement credit commensurate with other employees of the employing agency.

[ 1985 c 442 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1985 c 442: See notes following RCW 43.06.410.